Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 3
ELDER ABUSE TASK FORCE

26-3.1-301. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part repealed, (SB 13-111), ch. 233, p. 1128, § 17, effective May 16.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 2012 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2013. For the text of this part 3 prior to 2013, consult the 2012 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act repealing this part 3, see section 1 of chapter 233, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.